Hawaii statutes.
§281-111 Condemnation of property or
liquor; disposition. Any still, plant, or other equipment shown to have
been used for the manufacture of liquor in violation of this chapter and any
liquor manufactured or sold in violation of this chapter shall be subject to
summary seizure as herein provided or to subsequent seizure, and may be
condemned and adjudged forfeited to the State, in addition to any penalty
separately provided for the violation, the same to be enforced by appropriate
legal proceedings in the name of the State. All such property and liquor so
condemned and forfeited may be ordered by the court having jurisdiction (1) to
be wholly or partially destroyed, or (2) to be sold, wholly or partially, for
the account of the county wherein the same were seized; provided that the court
may order any such liquor, if suitable, to be delivered to the department of
health for distribution to any public institution for use therein for medicinal
purposes. The order of the court with respect to such property or liquor shall
be effectively executed by the sheriff or the sheriff's deputy, or by the chief
of police or the chief of police's deputy, or by any police officer, or by the
commission's administrator, or by any investigator, within such time as may be
fixed in the order but not exceeding sixty days. If any person, whether or not
an officer or employee of the State or any county, takes, disposes of, or uses
in any manner or to any extent, any of such property or liquor otherwise than
as herein provided, the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon
conviction thereof shall be punished as provided in section 281-102. [L Sp
1933, c 40, §70; RL 1935, §2638; RL 1945, §7290; RL 1955, §159-108; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §281-111; am L 1970, c 188, §39; gen ch 1985; am L
1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 171, §38 and c 281, §11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next